Oklahoma, session 2025, SB565.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 47 O.S. 2021, Section 1110, as


last amended by Section 1, Chapter 323, O.S.L. 2024 (47 O.S. Supp.


2024, Section 1110), is amended to read as follows:


Section 1110. A. 1. Except for a security interest in


vehicles held by a dealer for sale or lease, a vehicle registered by


a federally recognized Indian tribe as provided in subsection G of


this section, and a vehicle being registered in this state which was


previously registered in another state and which title contains the


name of a secured party on the face of the other state certificate


or title, and except as otherwise provided in subsection B of


Section 1105 of this title, a security interest in a vehicle as to

Req. No. 1187 Page 1


which a certificate of title may be properly issued by the Oklahoma


Tax Commission shall be perfected only when a lien entry form, and


the existing certificate of title, if any, or application for a


certificate of title and manufacturer’s certificate of origin


containing the name and address of the secured party and the date of


the security agreement and the required fee are delivered to the Tax


Commission or to a motor license agent. As used in this section,


the term “dealer” shall be defined as provided in Section 1-112 of


this title and the term “security interest” shall be defined as


provided in paragraph (35) of Section 1-201 of Title 12A of the


Oklahoma Statutes. When a vehicle title is presented to a motor


license agent for transferring or registering and the documents


reflect a lienholder, the motor license agent shall perfect the lien


pursuant to subsection G of Section 1105 of this title. For the


purposes of this section, the term “vehicle” shall not include


special mobilized machinery, machinery used in highway construction


or road material construction, and rubber-tired road construction


vehicles including rubber-tired cranes. The filing and duration of


perfection of a security interest, pursuant to the provisions of


Title 12A of the Oklahoma Statutes including, but not limited to,


Section 1-9-311 of Title 12A of the Oklahoma Statutes, shall not be


applicable to perfection of security interests in vehicles as to


which a certificate of title may be properly issued by the Tax


Commission, except as to vehicles held by a dealer for sale or lease

Req. No. 1187 Page 2


and except as provided in subsection D of this section. In all


other respects Title 12A of the Oklahoma Statutes shall be


applicable to such security interests in vehicles as to which a


certificate of title may be properly issued by the Tax Commission.


2. Whenever a person creates a security interest in a vehicle,


the person shall surrender to the secured party the certificate of


title or the signed application for a new certificate of title, on


the form prescribed by the Tax Commission, and the manufacturer’s


certificate of origin. The secured party shall deliver the lien


entry form and the required lien filing fee within twenty-five (25)


days as provided hereafter with certificate of title or the


application for certificate of title and the manufacturer’s


certificate of origin to the Tax Commission or to a motor license


agent. If the lien entry form, the lien filing fee and the


certificate of title or application for certificate of title and the


manufacturer’s certificate of origin are delivered to the Tax


Commission or to a motor license agent within twenty-five (25) days


after the date of the lien entry form, perfection of the security


interest shall begin from the date of the execution of the lien


entry form, but otherwise, perfection of the security interest shall


begin from the date of the delivery to the Tax Commission or to a


motor license agent.


3. a. For each security interest recorded on a certificate


of title, or manufacturer’s certificate of origin,

Req. No. 1187 Page 3


such person shall pay a fee of Ten Dollars ($10.00),


which shall be in addition to other fees provided for


in the Oklahoma Vehicle License and Registration Act.


Upon the receipt of the lien entry form and the


required fees with either the certificate of title or


an application for certificate of title and


manufacturer’s certificate of origin, a motor license


agent shall, by placement of a clearly distinguishing


mark, record the date and number shown in a


conspicuous place, on each of these instruments. Of


the ten-dollar fee, the motor license agent shall


retain Two Dollars ($2.00) for recording the security


interest lien.


b. It shall be unlawful for any person to solicit,


accept, or receive any gratuity or compensation for


acting as a messenger and for acting as the agent or


representative of another person in applying for the


recording of a security interest or for the


registration of a motor vehicle and obtaining the


license plates or for the issuance of a certificate of


title therefor unless the Tax Commission has appointed


and approved the person to perform such acts; and


before acting as a messenger, any such person shall


furnish to the Tax Commission a surety bond in such

Req. No. 1187 Page 4


amount as the Tax Commission shall determine


appropriate.


4. The certificate of title or the application for certificate


of title and manufacturer’s certificate of origin with the record of


the date of receipt clearly marked thereon shall be returned to the


debtor together with a notice that the debtor is required to


register and pay all additional fees and taxes due within thirty


(30) days from the date of purchase of the vehicle.


5. Any person creating a security interest in a vehicle that


has been previously registered in the debtor’s name and on which all


taxes due the state have been paid shall surrender the certificate


of ownership to the secured party. The secured party shall have the


duty to record the security interest as provided in this section and


shall, at the same time, obtain a new certificate of title which


shall show the secured interest on the face of the certificate of


title.


6. The lien entry form with the date and assigned number


thereof clearly marked thereon shall be returned to the secured


party. If the lien entry form is received and authenticated, as


herein provided, by a motor license agent, the agent shall make a


report thereof to the Tax Commission upon the forms and in the


manner as may be prescribed by the Tax Commission.





Req. No. 1187 Page 5


7. The Tax Commission shall have the duty to record the lien


upon the face of the certificate of title issued at the time of


registering and paying all fees and taxes due on the vehicle.


8. When there is an active lien from a commercial lender in


place on a vehicle, motor license agents shall be prohibited from


transferring the certificate of title on that vehicle until the lien


is satisfied, except when the title is transferred:


a. to a person whose name is included on the loan for


which the lien is placed pursuant to an agreement by


the lender and any party to the title,


b. to a trust created by a person whose name is included


on the loan for which the lien is placed, or


c. from a person who has died, upon the submission of a


death certificate, or


d. upon attestation by the managing member indicating


ownership, to a business entity from a person who owns


at least fifty percent (50%) of the business entity


receiving title. As part of such transfer, the


business entity receiving title and at the discretion


of the financial institution holding the lien, the


individual transferring title and the receiving


business entity may be added as an obligor to the


original note secured by the collateral to which the


transferring individual is a borrower. This shall not

Req. No. 1187 Page 6


be construed to require refinancing of the original


note. Service Oklahoma shall provide notification of


the transaction to the lienholder, ninety (90) days


prior to effectuating the title transfer and shall


develop an appropriate affidavit and notice necessary


to effectuate a transfer of title. A title transfer


initiated pursuant to this subparagraph shall not


preclude the lienholder from exercising all remedies


available to it in accordance with an agreement


between the lienholder and the individual transferring


title, up to and including repossession of the vehicle


and civil action against the individual transferring


title and receiving business entity. Further, until


the original lien is satisfied, the receiving business


entity shall be prohibited from transferring title to


another entity or person. Types of business entities


that may receive a transfer of title pursuant to this


subparagraph shall be limited to:


(1) sole proprietorships,


(2) general partnerships,


(3) limited partnerships,


(4) limited liability companies,


(5) professional limited partnerships, and


(6) professional limited liability companies.

Req. No. 1187 Page 7


No individual may perform a transfer, pursuant to this


subparagraph, to any business entity that is currently


engaging in any activity which is prohibited by federal or


state law.


The provisions of this paragraph shall not be construed to release


any lien or debt based solely upon a transfer of certificate of


title.


B. 1. A secured party shall, within seven (7) business days


after the satisfaction of the security interest, furnish directly or


by mail a release of a security interest to the Tax Commission and


mail a copy thereof to the last-known address of the debtor. If the


security interest has been satisfied by payment from a licensed used


motor vehicle dealer to whom the motor vehicle has been transferred,


the secured party shall also, within seven (7) business days after


such satisfaction receipt of a written request from such licensed


used motor vehicle dealer, mail an additional copy of the release to


the dealer. If the secured party fails to furnish the release as


required, the secured party shall be liable to the debtor for a


penalty of One Hundred Dollars ($100.00). Following the seven (7)


business days after satisfaction of the lien and upon receipt by the


lienholder of written communication demanding the release of the


lien, thereafter the penalty shall increase to One Hundred Dollars


($100.00) per day for each additional day beyond seven (7) business


days until accumulating to One Thousand Five Hundred Dollars

Req. No. 1187 Page 8


($1,500.00) or the value of the vehicle, whichever is less, and, in


addition, any loss caused to the debtor by such failure.


2. Upon release of a security interest the owner may obtain a


new certificate of title omitting reference to the security


interest, by submitting to the Tax Commission or to a motor license


agent:


a. a release signed by the secured party, an application


for new certificate of title and the proper fees, or


b. by submitting to the Tax Commission or the motor


license agent an affidavit, supported by such


documentation as the Tax Commission may require, by


the owner on a form prescribed by the Tax Commission


stating that the security interest has been satisfied


and stating the reasons why a release cannot be


obtained, an application for a new certificate of


title and the proper fees.


Upon receiving such affidavit that the security interest has been


satisfied, the Tax Commission shall issue a new certificate of title


eliminating the satisfied security interest and the name and address


of the secured parties who have been paid and satisfied. The Tax


Commission shall accept a release of a security interest in any form


that identifies the debtor, the secured party, and the vehicle, and


contains the signature of the secured party. The Tax Commission



Req. No. 1187 Page 9


shall not require any particular form for the release of a security


interest.


The words “security interest” when used in the Oklahoma Vehicle


License and Registration Act do not include liens dependent upon


possession.


C. The Tax Commission shall file and index certificates of


title so that at all times it will be possible to trace a


certificate of title to the vehicle designated therein, identify the


lien entry form, and the names and addresses of secured parties, or


their assignees, so that all or any part of such information may be


made readily available to those who make legitimate inquiry of the


Tax Commission as to the existence or nonexistence of security


interest in the vehicle.


D. 1. Any security interest in a vehicle properly perfected


prior to July 1, 1979, may be continued as to its effectiveness or


duration as provided by Sections 1-9-510 and 1-9-515 of Title 12A of


the Oklahoma Statutes, or may be terminated, assigned or released as


provided by Sections 1-9-512, 1-9-513 and 1-9-514 of Title 12A of


the Oklahoma Statutes, as fully as if this section had not been


enacted, or, at the option of the secured party, may also be


perfected under this section, and, if so perfected, the time of


perfection under this section shall be the date the security


interest was originally perfected under the prior law.



Req. No. 1187 Page 10


2. Upon request of the secured party, the debtor, or any other


holder of the certificate of title shall surrender the certificate


of title to the secured party and shall do such other acts as may be


required to perfect the security interest under this section.


E. If a manufactured home is permanently affixed to real


estate, an Oklahoma certificate of title may be surrendered to the


Tax Commission or a motor license agent for cancellation. When the


document of title is surrendered, the owner shall provide the legal


description or the appropriate tract or parcel number of the real


estate and other information as may be required on a form provided


by the Tax Commission. The Tax Commission may not cancel a document


of title if a lien has been registered or recorded. The Tax


Commission or motor license agent shall notify the owner and any


lienholder that the title has been surrendered to the Tax Commission


and that the Tax Commission may not cancel the title until the lien


is released. Such notification shall include a description of the


lien and such notification to the owner shall be accompanied by the


return of title surrendered. Permanent attachment to real estate


does not affect the validity of a lien recorded or registered with


the Tax Commission before the document of title is canceled pursuant


to this section. The rights of a prior lienholder pursuant to a


security agreement or the provisions of a credit transaction and the


rights of the state pursuant to a tax lien are preserved. The Tax


Commission or motor license agent shall forward the information to

Req. No. 1187 Page 11


the county assessor of the county where the real estate is located


and indicate whether the original document of title has been


canceled. A fee of Five Dollars ($5.00) shall accompany the


application for cancellation of title. When the fee is paid by a


person making an application directly with the Tax Commission, the


fee shall be deposited in the Oklahoma Tax Commission Revolving


Fund. A fee paid to a motor license agent shall be retained by the


agent. The owner of a manufactured home upon which the document of


title has been properly surrendered, may apply to the Tax Commission


for issuance of a new original certificate of title upon submission


of:


1. An attestation from the homeowner indicating ownership of


the manufactured home and the nonexistence of any security interest


or lien of record in the manufactured home; and


2. A title opinion by a licensed attorney, determining that the


owner of the manufactured home has marketable title to the real


property upon which the manufactured home is located and that no


documents filed of record in the county clerk’s office concerning


the real property contain a mortgage, recorded financial statement,


judgment, or lien of record. Persons or entities to whom the title


opinion is addressed may rely on the title opinion. A security


interest in a manufactured home perfected pursuant to this section


shall have priority over a conflicting interest of a mortgagee or


other lien encumbrancer, or the owner of the real property upon

Req. No. 1187 Page 12


which the manufactured home became affixed or otherwise permanently


attached. The holder of the security interest in the manufactured


home, upon default, may remove the manufactured home from such real


property. The holder of the security interest in the manufactured


home shall reimburse the owner of the real property who is not the


debtor and who has not otherwise agreed to access the real property


for the cost of repair of any physical injury to the real property,


but shall not be liable for any diminution in value to the real


property caused by the removal of the manufactured home, trespass,


or any other damages caused by the removal. The debtor shall notify


the holder of the security interest in the manufactured home of the


street address, if any, and the legal description of the real


property upon which the manufactured home is affixed or otherwise


permanently attached and shall sign such other documents, including


any appropriate mortgage, as may reasonably be requested by the


holder of such security interest.


F. In the case of motor vehicles or trailers, notwithstanding


any other provision of law, a transaction does not create a sale or


security interest merely because it provides that the rental price


is permitted or required to be adjusted under the agreement either


upward or downward by reference to the amount realized upon sale or


other disposition of the motor vehicle or trailer.


G. A security interest in vehicles registered by a federally


recognized Indian tribe shall be deemed valid under Oklahoma law if

Req. No. 1187 Page 13


validly perfected under the applicable tribal law and the lien is


noted on the face of the tribal certificate of title.


SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.




60-1-1187 CN 1/19/2025 5:38:50 AM







































Req. No. 1187 Page 14